Washington statutes.
RCW 11.48.120

Action on bond of previous personal representative.

Any personal representative may in his or her own name, for the benefit of all persons interested in the estate, as defined in RCW 11.96A.030(6) relative to a decedent's estate, maintain actions on the bond of a former personal representative of the same estate.

[ 2021 c 140 s 4002; 2010 c 8 s 2038; 1965 c 145 s 11.48.120. Prior: 1917 c 156 s 151; RRS s 1521; prior: Code 1881 s 1532; 1854 p 291 s 145.]